District of Columbia statutes.
20-722

Initial account; supervised administration.

A supervised personal representative’s initial account of the administration of the decedent’s property shall contain:

(a)

the total value of property as shown in all inventories made prior to the date of the account;

(b)

all receipts of the estate made prior to the date of the account;

(c)

each purchase, sale, lease, transfer, compromise, settlement, disbursement and distribution of assets of the estate, a description of each such transaction, and a statement of the amount by which it affects the amounts referred to in paragraphs (a) and (b); and

(d)

the value of any remaining assets in the possession or control of the personal representative.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(oo), 42 DCR 63
This section is referenced in § 20-731 and § 20-732.
1981 Ed., § 20-722.
Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-701.01.